Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.270

Other local governments and state agencies—May assist newly incorporated cities and towns.

Cities, towns, counties, and other local government agencies and state agencies may make loans of staff and equipment, and technical and financial assistance to the newly formed city or town during the interim period to facilitate the transition to an incorporated city or town. Such loans and assistance may be without compensation.

[ 1991 c 360 s 12.]